Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III.] EXERCISE OF URBAN RENEWAL

POWERS BY
A COUNTY DIRECTLY

[§53-81] County may exercise urban renewal
powers directly. As an alternative to either the creation under section
53-2 of an agency in a county or the continued existence of an agency theretofore
created in the county under said section, a county, rather than through such
agency, may directly exercise as provided in this part the powers conferred
upon an agency by parts I and II of this chapter. In the event that an agency
does not then exist in the county, the determination by a county to exercise
such powers directly rather than through such an agency shall be made by
ordinance of the council. In the event that an agency does then exist in the
county, the charter of the county shall provide for the abolition of the agency
and for the transfer of the powers, duties and functions of the agency to an
officer or department of the county, and the agency shall stand abolished as
provided in the charter. Upon such determination or abolition, as the case may
be, the county shall then possess all powers granted to a county by this part.
[L 1974, c 123, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next